New York, session 2025-2026, A1568.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 2 of section 296 of the executive law is 2 amended by adding a new paragraph (a-1) to read as follows: 3 (a-1) It shall be an unlawful discriminatory practice for the owner, 4 lessee, sublessee, assignee, or managing agent of publicly-assisted 5 housing accommodations or other person having the right of ownership or 6 possession of or the right to rent or lease such accommodations to 7 refuse to sell, rent or lease or otherwise deny or to withhold from any 8 person or group of persons such a housing accommodation on the basis 9 that such person or group of persons were involved in past, ongoing or 10 current landlord-tenant action or summary proceeding emanating from 11 article seven of the real property law, except where the tenant or group 12 of tenants have not satisfied the order. 13 § 2. Subdivision 3-b of section 296 of the executive law, as separate- 14 ly amended by chapters 202 and 748 of the laws of 2022, is amended to 15 read as follows: 16 3-b. It shall be an unlawful discriminatory practice for any real 17 estate broker, real estate salesperson or employee or agent thereof or 18 any other individual, corporation, partnership or organization for the 19 purpose of inducing a real estate transaction from which any such person 20 or any of its stockholders or members may benefit financially, to repre- 21 sent that a change has occurred or will or may occur in the composition 22 with respect to race, creed, color, national origin, citizenship or 23 immigration status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, 24 military status, sex, disability, past, ongoing or current landlord- 25 tenant action or summary proceeding emanating from article seven of the 26 real property law, marital status, status as a victim of domestic EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04452-01-5 A. 1568 2 1 violence, or familial status of the owners or occupants in the block, 2 neighborhood or area in which the real property is located, and to 3 represent, directly or indirectly, that this change will or may result 4 in undesirable consequences in the block, neighborhood or area in which 5 the real property is located, including but not limited to the lowering 6 of property values, an increase in criminal or anti-social behavior, or 7 a decline in the quality of schools or other facilities. 8 § 3. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 5 of section 296 of the executive 9 law is amended by adding a new subparagraph 1-a to read as follows: 10 (1-a) It shall be an unlawful discriminatory practice for the owner, 11 lessee, sublessee, assignee, or managing agent of, or any other person 12 having the right to sell, rent or lease a housing accommodation, 13 constructed or to be constructed, or any agent or employee thereof, to 14 refuse to sell, rent or lease or otherwise deny or to withhold from any 15 person or group of persons such a housing accommodation on the basis 16 that such person or group of persons were involved in past, ongoing or 17 current landlord-tenant action or summary proceeding emanating from 18 article seven of the real property law, except where the tenant or 19 group of tenants have not satisfied the order. 20 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.